Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 52 GROUND WATER DISTRICTS
§ 42-5224. Powers and duties of board of directors.

The board shall, in addition to any other powers and duties provided in this chapter, and provided that nothing in this chapter shall abrogate or impair the right of any person to take any action necessary to acquire, protect, challenge or defend any water right, have the following powers and duties:

To acquire, and/or construct, operate, control or use by appropriation, grant, purchase, bequest, devise, contract or lease works or facilities, water rights, water permits or licenses, well-drilling permits, wells, pipelines, ditches and any other real and personal property (including easements and rights-of-way) or contract entitlement within or without the district necessary or convenient to fully exercise its powers;

To sell, lease, encumber, alienate, or otherwise dispose of works or facilities, water, water rights, wells, pipelines, ditches, reservoirs, recharge facilities, and any other real and personal property owned by the district within or without its boundaries, and to incur indebtedness on behalf of the district as specified in this chapter;

To enter into contracts and agreements, cooperative and otherwise, including contracts with the United States of America and any of its agencies or instrumentalities, and tribes, and contracts with corporations, public or private, municipalities, or governmental subdivisions necessary or convenient to fully exercise its powers;

To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, hydrologists, geologists, and attorneys as shall be necessary and convenient to transact the district’s business and to represent the district’s interests;

To levy assessments for the operation of the district and its programs;

To represent district members, with respect to their individual water rights, in general water rights adjudications and other legal and administrative proceedings or before political bodies, provided that the board may levy assessments for these matters against only those members who have given written consent for the representation;

To represent district members in proceedings or meetings of a water district established by the director of the department notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code. Provided however, that the board shall not be authorized to cast a vote in any proceeding or meeting of a water district established pursuant to chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code, on behalf of any district member who has, prior to such proceeding or meeting, given written notice to the board and to the water district that such district member intends to vote on his own behalf, or on behalf of any district member who attends such meeting or proceeding and intends to vote on his own behalf. The board shall provide a verified list of the water rights that it represents at any water district proceeding or meeting to the chairman of the water district proceeding or meeting;

To appropriate, develop, store, and transport water within the state;

To acquire stock in canal companies, water companies, and water users’ associations;

To invest any surplus money in the district treasury pursuant to the public depository law as contained in chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code;

To develop, maintain, operate and implement mitigation plans designed to mitigate any material injury caused by ground water use within the district upon senior water uses within and/or without the district;
(12) To finance the repair or abandonment of wells in the ground water district which have experienced or are experiencing declines in water level or water pressures because of reasons including, but not limited to, flow, leakage, and waste from improper construction, maintenance, and operation of wells;

(13) To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for easements, rights-of-way, and other rights of access to property necessary to the exercise of the mitigation powers herein granted, both within and without the district;

(14) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions and proceedings;

(15) To enter into joint powers agreements and/or memoranda of understanding with other districts, governmental or quasi-public entities;

(16) To develop and acquire water rights for, and operate, aquifer storage or recharge projects;

(17) To monitor, measure, study, and implement programs in the interests of the district’s members regarding the protection of ground water diversions, depth of water in wells, aquifer water levels and characteristics;

(18) To adopt and amend bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects and affairs of the board and of the district and to establish a fiscal year;

(19) To enter upon land to make surveys, locate district property, works, or facilities, and to otherwise conduct the affairs of the district;

(20) To make, record and report annually to the director sufficient measurements of diversions and water levels of district members to allow the district to be excluded from any water measurements district created pursuant to sections 42-705 through 42-715, Idaho Code;

(21) To manage and conduct the affairs of the district and to have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

§ 42-5225. Authority to construct and operate ground water recharge or storage project.

Any ground water district organized under the laws of this state is authorized in section 42-234, Idaho Code, to file an application with the department to acquire water rights or to appropriate the unappropriated waters of the state for the purpose of storing waters in, or recharging, ground water basins within the district to aid in the efficient irrigation of district lands, to serve domestic, commercial, municipal or industrial uses within the district, or to carry out a mitigation plan. Upon approval of the application for permit by the director, the district shall proceed in the manner provided by law to construct and operate the ground water storage or recharge project. The construction and operation of the project shall be subject to such additional conditions and limitations as shall be imposed by the director pursuant to sections 42-203A, 42-222 and 42-234, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5226. Intersections with streets, railroads, watercourses.

The board of directors shall have power to construct the works necessary to implement an approved mitigation plan across any stream of water, watercourse, street, avenue, highway, railway, canal, ditch or flume which the works may intersect or cross, in such manner as to comply with the requirements of the stream channel alteration act, chapter 38, title 42, Idaho Code, and to afford security for life and property, provided that the board shall restore the same when so crossed or intersected, to its former state as near as may be, or in a sufficient manner not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness; and every company whose railroad shall be intersected or crossed pursuant to this section, shall unite with the board in forming the intersections and crossings and grant the privileges aforesaid; and if such railroad company and the board, or the owners and controllers of the property, thing or franchise to be crossed, cannot agree upon the amount to be paid therefor, or upon the points or the manner of said crossings or intersections, the same shall be ascertained and determined in all respects as herein provided in respect to the taking of land.

§ 42-5227. Officers must not be interested in contracts.

No director or any other officer named in this chapter shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom, except as a member of the district; and for any violation of this provision such officers shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and such conviction shall work a forfeiture of his office, and he shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

§ 42-5228. Indemnification of officers, directors, employees and agents.

The indemnification provisions of section 43-204A, Idaho Code, shall apply to ground water districts in the same manner as for irrigation districts.

§ 42-5229. Report to department of water resources.

At least as often as once a year after organization, the board of directors shall make a report to the department of the condition of the work of any mitigation plans developed by the district, as to capacity, stability and permanency, and whether or not any such mitigation plans are being successfully carried out, and whether or not in the opinion of the board the funds available will complete and maintain the mitigation plans. Upon the receipt of such report by the department, it may make such suggestions and recommendations to such board of directors as it deems advisable for the best interest of the district.

§ 42-5230. Statement of financial condition.

On or before the second Tuesday of February of each year the board of directors of each ground water district organized under this chapter shall publish in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper published in the county or counties in which such district is situated, a full, true and correct statement of the financial condition of the district, at the end of the last preceding fiscal year, giving all liabilities and assets of the district, in a form to be prescribed by the controller of the state of Idaho.

§ 42-5231. County commission to have access to books.

Any district board, or the secretary thereof, shall at any time allow any member of the county commission, when acting under resolution of the commissioners, to have access to all books, records and vouchers of the district which are in possession or control of the board of directors or secretary of the board.

§ 42-5232. Levy of assessments.

The secretary of the board shall be the assessor of the district, and on or before August 1 of each year shall prepare an assessment book containing a full and accurate list of all lands within the district that are subject to assessment under this chapter.

At a regular meeting of the board between August 1 and November 1 of each year, the board of directors shall determine the amount necessary to be raised for payment of the annual payment on any and all indebtedness of the district for the following year. Money received in payment of such assessments shall be deposited in a separate fund to be known as the debt retirement fund.

The board shall, in addition, determine the assessments necessary to pay, without limitation, the expenses of developing, operating or maintaining any mitigation plan established by the district and the cost of contracts with any person for mitigation plans, or evaluation of proposed contracts. Money received in payment of such assessments shall be deposited in a separate fund to be known as the mitigation expense fund.

The board shall, in addition, determine the assessments necessary to pay maintenance and operation of the district not related to mitigation plans or purposes. These operation and maintenance duties include making the assessment book, giving notice of assessments and making collections thereof, and other duties, programs or projects of the district to the extent such duties, programs or projects are not attributable to mitigation plans or purposes. Money received in payment of such assessments shall be deposited in a separate fund of the district to be known as the operating expense fund.

If, after levying the regular assessments described in this section, the board determines that the money held in such fund is inadequate or prior to the next regular assessment is likely to become inadequate to pay the expenses for which such fund exists, the board may levy an emergency assessment to pay such additional expenses; provided, that the board shall, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the meeting at which the board determines the amount necessary to pay such expenses, mail written notice of the board’s intent to levy an emergency assessment to each member of the district at the address on file with the district.

If a mitigation plan has been approved and a district member fails to operate in accordance with the plan, the board may take action to mitigate such member’s noncompliance and levy a special assessment against such member equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of all costs incurred by the district to mitigate such member’s noncompliance. If the noncompliance constitutes excess water use, the board may alternatively levy a special assessment equal to one hundred dollars ($100) per acre-foot of excess water use.

Any ground water user who becomes a member of a district for mitigation purposes shall be subject to no assessment beyond his proportional share of the costs, including administrative costs and other reasonable expenses, of any mitigation plan or actions or activities in furtherance of the district’s mitigation plans or purposes.

No assessment made pursuant to this chapter shall be a lien against any municipal property.

§ 42-5233. Power to incur indebtedness — Assessments to secure repayment — Warrants.

In order to secure funds for the mitigation plan or plans for the district, the board of directors may, by resolution duly adopted and entered upon the minutes, incur indebtedness by contract with a money lending institution; provided however, that the term of such indebtedness shall not exceed thirty (30) years. To secure the repayment of any indebtedness so incurred, the board shall levy assessments over the term of the indebtedness in amounts sufficient to repay the interest and principal as it falls due. Such assessments shall be levied in the manner and shall be subject to the limitations set forth in section 42-5232, Idaho Code. Assessments to repay debt with a term exceeding one (1) year may be levied only if the indebtedness has been approved at an election pursuant to sections 42-5234 through 42-5238, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the board of directors may, before the collection of the first assessment, incur indebtedness for the purpose of organization, or for any of the purposes of this chapter, and cause warrants of the district to issue therefor, provided that the total dollar amount of the warrants authorized to be issued shall not exceed three dollars ($3.00) for each acre of land authorized to be irrigated with ground water within the district, or for each two-hundredths (.02) of a cubic foot per second of ground water authorized to be diverted and used upon lands or facilities located within the district. Following the collection of the first assessment, the board of directors may at any time issue warrants of the district for the purpose of paying claims of indebtedness against the district, including salaries of officers and employees, not to exceed the district’s anticipated revenue.

The warrants herein authorized shall be in form and substance the same as county warrants or as nearly the same as may be practicable and shall be signed by the chairman and attested by the secretary of said board. All such warrants shall be presented by the holder thereof to the treasurer of the district for payment who shall endorse thereon the day of presentation for payment with the additional endorsement thereon, in case of nonpayment, that they are not paid for want of funds, and such warrants shall draw interest at a rate to be established by the board of directors from the date of their presentation to the treasurer for payment as aforesaid until such warrants are paid. No warrants shall be issued in payment of any indebtedness of such district for less than face or par value. It shall be the duty of the treasurer from time to time when sufficient funds are available for that purpose to advertise in a newspaper in the county in which the district is situated requiring the presentation to the treasurer for payment of as many of the outstanding warrants as are able to be paid. Ten (10) days after the first publication of said notice by the treasurer calling in any of said outstanding warrants, said warrants shall cease to bear interest, which shall be stated in the notice. Said notice shall be published two (2) weeks consecutively and said warrants shall be called in and paid in the order of their endorsement.

§ 42-5234. Election for indebtedness — Referendum petition.

The board may by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the board, determine that the interest of the district and the public interest and necessity demand the development and operation of a mitigation plan and shall set forth the amount of obligation or contract indebtedness proposed to be issued by the district under the provisions of this chapter for the development of such mitigation plan. If any obligation or contract indebtedness has a repayment term exceeding one (1) year, the board shall submit the obligation or contract indebtedness in the proposed resolution to a vote of the qualified electors of the district as defined in section 42-5210, Idaho Code, at an election to be held only if within fifteen (15) days after the passage of such resolution a referendum petition signed by qualified electors of the district whose aggregate ground water rights equal not less than ten percent (10%), measured in cubic feet per second or acres irrigated, of the aggregate ground water rights of all qualified electors of the district, shall be filed with the secretary of the district requesting that an election upon the issuance of the contract indebtedness be held and conducted under the provisions of this section. Any election required to be held pursuant to a referendum petition filed in accordance with this section for the purpose of submitting any proposition or propositions of incurring such obligation or indebtedness shall be held in accordance with section 34-106, Idaho Code. The resolution, in addition to such declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the mitigation plan, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the sources of the revenues and assessments pledged to the payment of the indebtedness. The separate election upon the assessments, shall be held at the same time as and shall be combined with any such election required to be held upon the indebtedness question pursuant to a referendum petition.

Any election for indebtedness required to be held hereunder shall be called by resolution, which resolution shall also fix the date upon which such election shall be held, the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the indebtedness. Such resolution shall also fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the election and shall designate the precincts and polling places and shall appoint for each polling place, from each precinct from the electors thereof, the officers of such election, which officers shall consist of three (3) judges, one (1) of whom shall act as clerk, who shall constitute a board of election for each polling place. The description of precincts may be made by reference to any order or orders of the county commission of the county or counties in which the district or any part thereof is situated, or by reference to any previous order, or resolution of the board or by detailed description of such precincts. Precincts established by the county commissions of the various counties may be consolidated for special elections held hereunder. In the event any such election shall be called to be held concurrently with any other election or shall be consolidated therewith, the resolution calling the election hereunder need not designate precincts or polling places or the names of officers of election, but shall contain reference to the act or order calling such other election and fixing the precincts and polling places and appointing election officers therefrom. The resolution calling the election shall prescribe an official notice of election, which notice shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for said election, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, and no other or further notice of such election or publication of the names of election officers or of the precincts or polling places need be given or made.
(3) The respective election boards shall conduct the election in their respective precincts in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of district elections to the extent the same shall apply and shall make their returns to the district secretary. At any regular or special meeting of the board held not earlier than five (5) days following the date of such election, the returns shall be canvassed and the results declared.

(4) If no referendum petition is filed, or if so filed, if it shall appear from the returns that the qualified electors of the district representing two-thirds (2/3) of the aggregate ground water rights of the district, such fraction computed according to cubic feet per second, have voted in favor of the proposition, the district thereupon shall be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, or enter into such contracts, all for the purposes provided for in the proposition submitted in the resolution, and in the amount so provided. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent election or elections called for such purpose.

§ 42-5235. Judicial examination.

Prior to the incurring of indebtedness with a repayment term exceeding one (1) year, the board shall file a petition in the district court of the county in which the office of the board is located, pursuant to the provisions of sections 43-406 through 43-408, Idaho Code, as if the district were an irrigation district. Whenever any district which is required to file a petition hereunder has or proposes to enter into a contract or contracts with one (1) or more districts pursuant to law, and such other district or districts is authorized or required to bring a confirmation proceeding or proceedings pursuant to the provisions of section 43-406 or section 43-1808, Idaho Code, with respect to such contracts or the levy of assessments or the apportionment of costs, the boards of each of such other districts shall join in the filing of such petition, and the district court in which such petition is filed shall have jurisdiction to hear the petition and to grant the relief prayed for therein. Each such petition shall pray for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred hereby or by any amendment hereto or of any assessment levied or of any apportionment of costs or of any act, proceeding or contract of the district or districts, whether or not said contracts shall have been executed, including, without limitation, proposed contracts for the reconstruction, rehabilitation, replacement and improvement of any well and other related structures and works and appurtenances, falling water contracts, contracts with other districts and contracts with other public and private persons, firms, corporations and associations. Such petition shall set forth the facts whereon the validity of such powers, assessments, apportionments, acts, proceedings or contracts is founded. Notice of the filing of said petition shall be given by the clerk of the court by mailing, and by publication in at least one (1) newspaper published and of general circulation within the boundaries of each district joining in the petition, or if no newspaper is so published within any district, then in a newspaper published in the same county in which any part of such district is located which is of general circulation in such district, pursuant to and in accordance with the requirements of section 43-407, Idaho Code, as if the district were an irrigation district under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any contract or contracts, therein mentioned, may be examined.

§ 42-5236. Judicial proceedings to test validity.

If any official required to participate in any act leading to the calling or holding of the required election or the execution of any required contract shall refuse to perform such act alleging as his reason illegality of the proposed election or the proposed contract, the board may institute judicial proceedings to compel such steps to be taken and legality of the election or the contract to be determined. All cases in which there may arise a question of the validity of any proceeding under this act shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern, and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of this act.

§ 42-5237. Tax exemption.

Interim notes, and the interest thereon, issued pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter shall be exempt from taxation under the Idaho income tax law.

§ 42-5238. Liberal construction.

Any restrictions, limitations or regulations relative to the execution of such contracts pursuant to the authority herein contained in any other act shall not apply to the execution of such contracts pursuant to the authority herein contained. Any act inconsistent herewith shall be deemed modified to conform with the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of this chapter only. This chapter being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, and for the security of public and private property, it shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this chapter.

§ 42-5239. Lending institutions — Right to compel assessments — Alternative remedy.

If in any year the board of directors fails to levy assessments for the repayment of indebtedness in amounts sufficient to meet a payment or payments falling due, the lender may bring an action in the district court of any county in which the district is situated to compel the board to levy assessments in amounts sufficient to insure the payment thereof. In the event that the annual assessment to meet a payment or payments falling due will be unreasonably high, the district court may, in the alternative, enter an order requiring that moneys received by the district in payment of assessments for all purposes be first expended for the repayment of that portion of the indebtedness falling due.

§ 42-5240. Lien of assessment.

From and after January 1 of any year, all assessments, other than those levied against municipalities, shall be liens against the land of ground water users to which the water rights used to determine assessments are appurtenant, and notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter or any provisions incorporated therein by reference, shall be superior to the lien of any mortgage or deed of trust, whether prior in time or not, provided that notice of the assessment delinquency is sent to the mortgage or deed of trust holder at least sixty (60) days prior to any foreclosure sale of the property. Said assessment liens shall not be removed until the assessments are paid or the property is sold for the payment thereof, and shall constitute such lien until paid. Upon any sale of the property the purchaser at such sale shall take the property subject to any annual assessments of the district subsequent in time to the assessment for which the foreclosure occurred. Nothing in this section alters or affects any liens of water related districts or entities authorized pursuant to Idaho law.

§ 42-5241. Payment of assessments — When delinquent — Interest and penalties.

District assessments levied pursuant to subsections (2) through (4) of section 42-5232, Idaho Code, shall be billed and collected in one (1) of the following ways:

On or before the first day of December, the treasurer of the district shall mail an assessment bill to each water user and shall publish a notice for a period of not less than two (2) weeks in a newspaper published or having general circulation in each of the counties in which any part of the district is situated, which bill and notice shall set forth the date by which assessments must be paid and the times and places at which payment may be made. Assessments collected by the ground water district shall be due and payable on or before December 31 of each year, after which date each unpaid assessment shall be delinquent; shall bear interest at the rate of interest established for money due on judgments until paid; shall entitle the district to take any appropriate action to collect the assessment, including suit and the foreclosure of liens as provided in this chapter; and, in addition, shall be subject to a penalty in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per delinquent assessment; or

The board of directors of any ground water district organized under the laws of this state desiring to provide for the collection of district assessments by the county treasurer instead of the district treasurer may do so by adopting a resolution providing for collection by the county treasurer, and furnishing a copy of the resolution to the county auditor of each county in which any of the district lands are located; provided that the county commissioners of the county or counties must first approve the ground water district resolution by a proper resolution of the board of county commissioners adopted by a majority of the county commissioners and made and entered upon the minutes of the board or boards of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners’ resolution may provide for collection fees and for any additional fee against the ground water district for the cost of transferring records and initiating the collection process. The board of county commissioners of any county, having determined that the collection of ground water district assessments is an undue burden upon the county and shall no longer be provided, shall notify the board of directors of the ground water district by December 1 in the year preceding the year for which the action shall first be effective by providing to the board of directors a certified copy of the majority decision of the board of county commissioners.

District assessments levied pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of section 42-5232, Idaho Code, shall be billed and collected in one (1) of the ways as provided in subsection (1) of this section, provided that assessments billed and collected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section may be mailed at any time of the year and shall be due and payable within thirty (30) days after mailing.

If the ground water district board determines to issue assessments through the respective counties, the treasurer of the ground water district first shall prepare a list containing the legal description, the assessor’s parcel number, the name and last known address of the owner of record, and the amount of the assessment for each parcel. The sum assessed and charged against each parcel shall be entered by the ground water district as the operation and maintenance assessment of the (name of district) ground water district. On or before the third Tuesday of July of each year, the list shall be certified by the treasurer of the ground water district to the county auditor of the county in which the lands are located, and the county treasurer shall enter the same upon the tax rolls, as provided by law for the entry of taxes, against the land of each of the persons named in the list, together with the amounts thereof; and the same shall be subject to the same interest and penalties in case of delinquency as in the case of property taxes and shall be collected in the same manner as taxes and subject to the same right of redemption, and the lands sold for the collection of delinquency shall be subject to the same right of redemption as the sale of land for property taxes.
When a ground water district includes lands in more than one (1) county, the treasurer of the ground water district shall prepare separate lists for the county assessor for each county. When a parcel lies partly in one county and partly in another county, only the portion in a county shall be included on the list for that county. If the legal description of any parcel on any such list differs from the legal description as shown by the assessor’s records, the assessor shall notify the district treasurer of the discrepancy and the district treasurer shall submit to the county assessor an addendum changing the description to conform with the assessor’s records; provided, that where the discrepancy between the descriptions occurs because a portion of the parcel lies outside the district, no change in description shall be required and the district assessments shall be effective only as to the portions of any parcel that are within district boundaries.

Assessments shall be due and payable on the date specified in the county’s tax notice, shall be collected and accounted for by the county treasurer in the same manner as property taxes, and shall be paid over to the ground water district treasurer together with any penalties or interest collected. The county shall enforce the collection of assessments in the same manner as it enforces the collection of taxes of the county, and failure to pay the assessment shall be subject to the same penalties. The collection of a ground water district’s assessments by the county treasurer shall not make the district’s obligations respecting any bond, contract, debt, or interest the obligation of the county.

§ 42-5242. Entry of delinquent assessments — Filing of delinquency list.

On or before the 15th day of January of each year the treasurer shall enter the amount of all delinquent assessments upon the assessment book, which entry shall be considered to be dated as of the first day of January. Such entry shall have the force and effect of a sale to the treasurer of the district as grantee in trust for the district of all property to which a lien has attached as a result of such unpaid assessments.

The treasurer shall compile a list of such delinquency entries which shall contain the names of the persons or entities to whom the assessments were directed and the amount of such delinquent assessments together with the amount of the penalties to be added thereto. A certified copy of the delinquency list, duly acknowledged by the treasurer, shall be filed with the county recorder of each county in which the properties affected by such delinquent assessments are located, and the treasurer shall then provide by certified mail a notice of delinquency to each ground water user having a delinquent assessment.

Upon the payment in full of any delinquent assessment and penalty that was entered on a recorded delinquency list, the treasurer shall file with the county recorder of each county in which the list of delinquent assessments was recorded an acknowledged notice that the delinquent assessment and any penalty owed has been paid in full. The treasurer shall file any notices of payment of delinquent assessments with the county recorders, as required, on at least a monthly basis.

§ 42-5243. Redemption and sale of property subject to delinquent assessments.

The manner in which property subject to a lien for nonpayment of assessments may be redeemed, and if not redeemed, shall be sold as provided in sections 43-712, 43-715 through 43-721, 43-724 and 43-726, Idaho Code, to the extent that the provisions thereof are in keeping with the provisions of this chapter.

§ 42-5244. Prohibition against participation in mitigation plan when subject to delinquent assessment or for nonpayment of other mitigation costs. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 261, § 1, effective April 1, 2019. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 42-5244A and 42-5244B.

§ 42-5244A. Apportionment of mitigation plan obligations.

The board of directors may apportion among district members mitigation plan obligations requiring district members to limit the amount of water diverted under their respective ground water rights or perform other actions to mitigate material injury to senior priority water rights caused by ground water use within the district.

Each member shall bear a proportionate share of the district’s total mitigation obligation. The proportionate share shall be based on:

The ratio which the quantity of water the member is authorized to divert under the member’s ground water right(s) bears to the total quantity of water authorized for diversion under the ground water rights of all members of the district; or

The ratio which the number of acres the member is authorized to irrigate under the member’s ground water right bears to the total number of acres authorized for irrigation under the ground water rights of all members of the district.

The board shall adjust each member’s proportionate share of the district’s obligation based on priority date, unless the mitigation plan benefits all members equally. The board may additionally adjust a member’s proportionate share of the district’s obligation based on consumptive use under the member’s ground water rights or other attributes of the member’s ground water rights.

Any nonirrigator who is a member of a ground water district, or whose ground water rights are appurtenant to property located within a ground water district, may propose a separate mitigation plan to the director. If the director approves the nonirrigator’s mitigation plan, and the nonirrigator implements the mitigation plan, the nonirrigator shall be entitled to a credit for the contribution made by that nonirrigator’s mitigation plan toward the district’s mitigation obligation as determined by the director.